Utah statutes.
10-18-305.   Quality of service standards.
(1)  A municipality that provides a cable television service or a public
telecommunications service shall adopt an ordinance governing the quality of
service the municipality shall provide to its subscribers.
(2) The ordinance required by Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  be competitively neutral; and
(b)  contain standards that are substantially similar to the standards imposed
on private providers operating within the geographic boundaries of the
municipality under:
(i)  the Cable Communications Policy Act of 1984, 47 U.S.C. 521, et seq.;
(ii)  the Telecommunications Act of 1996, Pub. L. 104-104;
(iii)  Title 54, Public Utilities;
(iv)  regulations issued by the Federal Communications Commission under the
statutes listed in Subsections (2)(b)(i) and (ii); and
(v)  rules made by the Public Service Commission of Utah under Title 54,
Public Utilities.
